Illinois, session 104th, SB3627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 631 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/631 new)8    Sec. 631. Quick-build infrastructure. The Department shall 9accept a request for proposal for a quick-build infrastructure 10as an alternative for an infrastructure project.11    A quick-build infrastructure accepted under this Section 12may include a cycle lane segregator or other temporary 13infrastructure solution. A cycle lane segregator shall have 14the following specifications: a height of 5 centimeters, 9 15centimeters, or 13 centimeters; flexible cushions that absorb 16on impact; reflective strips that provide high visibility 17during both day and night; and highly durable.18    As used in this Section, "cycle lane segregator" means a 19device intended to prevent a vehicle from entering a cycle 20lane that is bolted into the ground and spaced out so that 21cyclists can enter or exit the cycle lane as needed.